District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.51

Standing.

A shareholder shall not commence or maintain a derivative proceeding unless the shareholder:

(1)

Was a shareholder of the corporation at the time of the act or omission complained of or became a shareholder through transfer by operation of law from one that was a shareholder at that time; and

(2)

Fairly and adequately represents the interests of the corporation in enforcing the right of the corporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-306.09.